Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4238.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin REPORT ON HEALTH IMPACTS OF LEAD-CONTAINING BULLETS RETAINED IN THE HUMAN BODY.new text end new text begin (a) By January 15, 2027, the commissioner of health must submit a report that contains a summary and analysis of scientific findings on the health impacts of lead-containing bullets when retained in the human body, with a focus on the effects on the mental, emotional, and physical development of children and youth. The report must, at a minimum: new text end new text begin (1) summarize literature published to date on the health impacts of lead-containing bullets when retained in the human body; new text end new text begin (2) review and analyze state-level legislation aimed at limiting lead exposure to individuals resulting from retained lead-containing bullets; and new text end new text begin (3) provide recommendations for how to reduce any public health impacts of lead-containing bullets retained in the human body in the state. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of health must submit the report in paragraph (a) to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over health. new text end